Nebraska, session 109, LB325.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 44-211, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
44-211 (1) The business and affairs of an insurance corporation shall be
managed by the incorporators until the first meeting of shareholders or members
and then and thereafter by a board of directors elected by the shareholders or
members and as otherwise provided by law.
(2)(a)(i) The board of directors shall consist of not less than five
persons, and, except as provided in subdivision (a)(ii) of this subsection, one
of them shall be a resident of the State of Nebraska.
(ii) Subdivision (a)(i) of this subsection shall not apply for a period of
five years upon the filing of an affidavit with the department. Such affidavit
shall be executed by the president or chairperson of the board of directors of
such insurance corporation and affirm that the insurance corporation meets the
following criteria:
(A) The insurance corporation's principal corporate executive offices are
located within the State of Nebraska;
(B) The insurance corporation is a publicly traded corporation on a
federally governed stock exchange or is a wholly owned affiliate of such a
publicly traded corporation;
(C) The insurance corporation has been domiciled in the State of Nebraska
for at least twenty-five years;
(D) The insurance corporation employs more than five hundred employees who
are employed in Nebraska and subject to the Nebraska income tax on compensation
received from the insurance corporation; and
(E) The ultimate controlling entity of the insurance corporation, as
defined by the department, has not changed in ten years.
(iii) The affidavit described in this subsection may be filed by an
insurance corporation any time after the criteria listed in subdivision (a)(ii)
of this subsection are met by the insurance corporation. An insurance
corporation may file a new affidavit upon the expiration of the five-year
period. If at any time during the five-year period the insurance corporation no
longer complies with subdivision (a)(ii) of this subsection, the insurance
corporation shall (A) provide written notice to the department that specifies
the criteria with which the insurance corporation no longer complies and (B)
appoint a member of the board of directors of the insurance corporation who is
a resident of the State of Nebraska in accordance with subdivision (a)(i) of
this subsection within six calendar months after the criteria are no longer
met.
(iv) The affidavit described in this subsection shall be made before an
officer authorized to administer oaths under the laws of this state or under
the laws of the state where execution occurs. Such execution shall be evidenced
by the officer's certificate under official seal and shall substantially be in
the form found in this subdivision.
STATE OF .....................................
COUNTY OF ........................................
I, .........., the president or chairperson of the board of directors
of .........., an insurance corporation domiciled in the State of Nebraska,
hereby declare that .......... insurance corporation is an insurance
corporation that complies with all of the criteria in section 44-211 of the
Statutes of Nebraska for waiver of the statutory requirement that at least one
member of the insurance corporation's board of directors shall be a resident of
the State of Nebraska. I further declare that if at any time during the five-
year period allowed under section 44-211 the .......... insurance corporation
fails to comply with all of the criteria in section 44-211, the insurance
corporation will notify the Department of Insurance of such failure and will
work to appoint a member of the board of directors who is a resident of the
State of Nebraska as required by section 44-211 within six months after such
failure.
Board President or Chairperson .............................
Subscribed, sworn to, and acknowledged before me by .........., the
affiant, and subscribed and sworn to before me by ...............
and .........., witnesses, this ..... day of ....... 20.... .
(SEAL) (Signed) ..............................
(Official capacity of officer) ..............................
(b) At least one-fifth of the directors of an insurance company, which is
not subject to section 44-2135, shall be persons who are not officers or
employees of such company.
-1-

LB325 LB325
2025 2025
(c) A person convicted of a felony shall may not be a director. ,
(d) All and all directors shall be of good moral character and known
professional, administrative, or business ability that includes , such business
ability to include a practical knowledge of insurance, finance, or investment.
(e) If the company is a mutual company or assessment association, no No
person shall hold the office of director unless he or she is a policyholder ,
if the company is a mutual company or assessment association.
(3) Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, the board
of directors shall make all bylaws. A director shall discharge his or her
duties as a director in accordance with section 21-2,102.
Sec. 2. Original section 44-211, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
repealed.
-2-